assignment1-DinhCuongLuc.foma
! Read the lexicon definition file
read lexc assignment1-DinhCuongLuc.lexc

! Define orthographic (spelling) rules

! (A) Delete final 'e' before suffixes beginning with a vowel (ion/or/able/ity)
!     Example: translate^ion → translation; translate^able → translatable; translate^or → translator
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [i | o | a];

! (B) Remove the boundary marker '^' after all transformations
define RemoveHat "^" -> 0;

! Compose the final network (lexicon + spelling rules)
define Net Root .o. EDeletion .o. RemoveHat;

define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;

! Compile and activate the network

regex Net;
